Utah statutes.
63M-1-1606.   Annual report.

The office shall submit, before November 1, an annual written report of the program's operations and recommendations to:

(1)  the governor;

(2)  the Rural Development Legislative Liaison Committee created in Section 36-25-102; and

(3)  the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee.



Amended by Chapter 255, 2013 General Session

